North Carolina, session 2025, SB146.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Definition. – For purposes of this section, wake surfing means the
operation of a motorboat, as defined in G.S. 75A-2, to which weight has been added in the stern
via water-filled tanks or other ballasts for the purpose of creating an artificially enlarged wake
that is or is intended to be surfed by another person towed behind the motorboat.
SECTION 1.(b) Prohibition. – No person may engage in wake surfing within 500
feet of the shoreline or any structure, moored vessel, kayak, canoe, paddleboard, or swimmer.
SECTION 2. Violation. – A violation of this act is a Class 1 misdemeanor punishable
by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) in addition to any other punishment
prescribed for that offense.
SECTION 3. Enforcement. – This act is enforceable by law enforcement officers of
the Wildlife Resources Commission, by sheriffs and deputy sheriffs, and by other peace officers
with general subject matter jurisdiction.
SECTION 4. Applicability. – This act applies only to the waters of Lake Glenville
in Jackson County.
SECTION 5. Effective Date. – This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and
applies to offenses committed on or after that date.
*S146-v-1*